Illinois, session 104th, HB3640.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facilities (PRTF) Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Department" means the Department of Healthcare and Family 8Services. 9    "Emergency safety intervention" means the use of restraint 10or seclusion as an immediate response to an emergency safety 11situation. 12    "Medical assistance" means health care benefits provided 13under the Illinois Medical Assistance Program administered 14under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code.15    "Psychiatric residential treatment facility" or "PRTF" 16means a facility that is certified by the Department to 17provide subacute psychiatric services to individuals under age 1821, or to individuals until their 22nd birthday if the 19individual was admitted to the PRTF before the individual's 2021st birthday as described in 42 CFR 441, Subpart D, or any 21successor regulation, in an inpatient setting in accordance 22with a provider agreement with the Department. A PRTF is not:23        (1) a hospital under the Hospital Licensing Act;  HB3640- 2 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1        (2) a child care institution or child care facility 2    under the Child Care Act of 1969;3        (3) a nursing home or long-term care facility under 4    the Nursing Home Care Act;5        (4) a secure residential youth care facility under the 6    Secure Residential Youth Care Facility Licensing Act;7        (5) a specialized mental health rehabilitation 8    facility under the Specialized Mental Health 9    Rehabilitation Act of 2013; or10        (6) any facility or institution required to be 11    licensed under the ID/DD Community Care Act or the MC/DD 12    Act.13    "Serious occurrences" means a serious injury to a resident 14as defined in 42 CFR 483.352, or any successor regulation, a 15resident's suicide attempt, or a resident's death.16    "Subacute psychiatric services" means inpatient 17psychiatric treatment services provided under the direction of 18a physician, in a non-acute (non-hospital) setting, for 19individuals under the age of 21 (or for individuals until 20their 22nd birthday if admitted to the PRTF before their 21st 21birthday) that require intensive services that cannot be 22delivered in a community setting. Subacute psychiatric 23services are short-term, comprehensive, recovery-oriented 24treatment delivered 24 hours a day, 7 days a week, with the 25focus of returning children to a less restrictive community 26setting as rapidly as possible.    HB3640- 3 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Section 10. PRTF services. 2    (a) The Department shall establish an Illinois Psychiatric 3Residential Treatment Facilities (PRTF) program that is 4family-driven, youth-guided, and trauma-informed, and includes 5youth and family involvement in all aspects of care planning. 6The Illinois PRTF program design shall establish meaningful 7opportunities for youth and families to be involved in the 8design, monitoring, and oversight of PRTF services. 9    (b) By January 1, 2026, the Department shall submit a 10State Plan Amendment to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 11Services to establish coverage of federally authorized, 12medically necessary inpatient psychiatric services delivered 13by a certified PRTF to medical assistance beneficiaries under 1421 years of age. 15    (c) The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 16Illinois PRTF program. The rules may establish the services, 17standards, and requirements for participation in the program 18to comply with all applicable federal statutes, regulations, 19requirements, and policies. The rules proposed by the 20Department may take into consideration the recommendations of 21the PRTF Advisory Committee, as outlined in Section 20. At a 22minimum, the rules shall include the following: 23        (1) Certification and participation requirements for 24    PRTF providers in compliance with all applicable federal 25    laws, regulations, requirements, and policies, including   HB3640- 4 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    those found at 42 CFR 441, Subpart D and 42 CFR 483, 2    Subpart G or any successor regulations. 3        (2) Monitoring and oversight of PRTF services, 4    including on-site review protocols that include scheduled 5    and unannounced on-site visits. Each provider seeking PRTF 6    certification shall minimally have an on-site review prior 7    to initiating services and all PRTFs shall have at least 8    one on-site review annually thereafter. 9        (3) Utilization management criteria to ensure that 10    PRTF services are provided as medically necessary and 11    emphasize clinically appropriate patient transitions back 12    to the community, including, but not limited to, service 13    authorization, documentation, and treatment plan 14    requirements for initial stay reviews and continued stay 15    reviews. 16        (4) A limit on allowable beds at any one PRTF, not to 17    exceed 40 total beds, unless waived in writing by the 18    Director of the Department. 19        (5) A limit on the number of new PRTF facilities to be 20    certified in any State fiscal year. 21        (6) A requirement that PRTFs are distinct, standalone 22    non-hospital entities not physically attached or adjacent 23    to any other type of facility engaged in providing 24    congregate care. 25        (7) A requirement that, in order to obtain PRTF 26    certification, providers must undergo a survey from the   HB3640- 5 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    State Survey Agency, the Department of Public Health, to 2    establish the provider's compliance with the Conditions of 3    Participation for PRTFs outlined in 42 CFR 483, Subpart G 4    and the Interpretive Guidelines issued by the Centers for 5    Medicare and Medicaid Services. 6        (8) A requirement that, in order to obtain PRTF 7    certification, providers be accredited from one of the 8    following organizations identified in 42 CFR 441.151, or 9    any successor regulations: 10            (i) Joint Commission on Accreditation of 11        Healthcare Organizations. 12            (ii) The Commission on Accreditation of 13        Rehabilitation Facilities. 14            (iii) The Council on Accreditation of Services for 15        Families and Children. 16            (iv) Any other accrediting organization with 17        comparable standards recognized by the Department. 18        (9) Requirements for the reporting of emergency safety 19    interventions and serious occurrences to the Department 20    and the State-designated Protection and Advocacy System no 21    later than the close of business the next business day 22    after the intervention or occurrence.  23    Section 15. PRTF capacity analysis. 24    (a) The Department shall establish, and update as needed, 25a methodology for completing a statewide PRTF capacity   HB3640- 6 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1analysis for the purposes of identifying capacity needs for 2PRTF services under the Illinois Medical Assistance Program. 3The Department shall utilize the PRTF capacity analysis to 4inform its certification and enrollment of PRTF providers. The 5capacity analysis shall minimally include:6        (1) An analysis of aggregate service utilization data 7    for Medicaid eligible individuals under the age of 21, 8    including community-based services, behavioral health 9    crisis services, and inpatient psychiatric hospitalization 10    services.11        (2) Identification of locations across the State with 12    demonstrated need for PRTF services and locations with 13    demonstrated surplus of PRTF service capacity. 14        (3) Consideration of specialized treatment needs based 15    on increased utilization of out-of-state facilities to 16    address specialized treatment needs. 17        (4) Other factors of consideration identified by the 18    Department as necessary to support access to care, 19    compliance with the federal Medicaid program, and all 20    other applicable federal or State laws, regulations, 21    policies, requirements, and programs impacting Illinois' 22    children's behavioral health service delivery system. 23        (5) Recommendations to the Department and the PRTF 24    Advisory Committee on capacity needs within the Illinois 25    PRTF program. The recommendations shall seek to avoid the 26    concentration of PRTF facilities in any particular   HB3640- 7 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    community or area of the State to promote access for 2    families or guardians to visit patients when appropriate. 3    (b) The Department's methodology, completed analyses, and 4outcomes shall be published on its website, with an initial 5PRTF capacity analysis to be published by no later than 6January 1, 2026. 7    (c) The Department's PRTF capacity analysis shall be 8updated at a minimum of every 5 years and shall be performed 9consistent with the Department's published methodology.  10    Section 20. PRTF Advisory Committee. 11    (a) The Department shall establish a PRTF Advisory 12Committee responsible for reviewing and providing guidance on 13the Department's policies and implementations of the Illinois 14PRTF program. The PRTF Advisory Committee shall be made up of 15no more than 12 members, including State agency staff familiar 16with children's behavioral health services, and shall 17minimally include the following members:18        (1) the Director of Healthcare and Family Services, or 19    the Director's designee, who shall also be the Chair of 20    the Committee;21        (2) the Director of Public Health, or the Director's 22    designee;23        (3) the Secretary of Human Services, or the 24    Secretary's designee; 25        (4) the Superintendent of the Illinois State Board of   HB3640- 8 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Education, or the Superintendent's designee; 2        (5) the Director of Children and Family Services, or 3    the Director's designee; 4        (6) the Chief Officer for Children's Behavioral Health 5    Transformation; and 6        (7) external stakeholders that include, at a minimum 7    each of the following: 8            (i) a psychiatrist, board certified to serve 9        children and adolescents; 10            (ii) one or more providers of community-based 11        children's behavioral health services;12            (iii) one or more individuals representing the 13        voice of families with children familiar with 14        Illinois' publicly funded children's behavioral health 15        system; and 16            (iv) other individuals determined by the 17        Department to be beneficial to the outcomes of the 18        Advisory Committee.19    (b) The PRTF Advisory Committee shall meet on a schedule 20and in a format defined by the Chair.21    (c) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 22Section.  23    Section 25. PRTF accountability reporting. For all PRTF 24providers certified to participate in the Illinois Medical 25Assistance Program, the Department shall publish on its   HB3640- 9 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1website counts of reported emergency safety interventions and 2serious occurrences by State fiscal year and quarter. 3    Section 105. The Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation 4Act of 2013 is amended by changing Section 1-102 as follows: 5    (210 ILCS 49/1-102)6    Sec. 1-102. Definitions. For the purposes of this Act, 7unless the context otherwise requires:8    "Abuse" means any physical or mental injury or sexual 9assault inflicted on a consumer other than by accidental means 10in a facility.11    "Accreditation" means any of the following:12        (1) the Joint Commission;13        (2) the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation 14    Facilities;15        (3) the Healthcare Facilities Accreditation Program; 16    or17        (4) any other national standards of care as approved 18    by the Department.19    "APRN" means an Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, 20nationally certified as a mental health or psychiatric nurse 21practitioner and licensed under the Nurse Practice Act. 22    "Applicant" means any person making application for a 23license or a provisional license under this Act.24    "Consumer" means a person, 18 years of age or older,   HB3640- 10 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1admitted to a mental health rehabilitation facility for 2evaluation, observation, diagnosis, treatment, stabilization, 3recovery, and rehabilitation.4    "Consumer" does not mean any of the following:5        (i) an individual requiring a locked setting;6        (ii) an individual requiring psychiatric 7    hospitalization because of an acute psychiatric crisis;8        (iii) an individual under 18 years of age;9        (iv) an individual who is actively suicidal or violent 10    toward others;11        (v) an individual who has been found unfit to stand 12    trial and is currently subject to a court order requiring 13    placement in secure inpatient care in the custody of the 14    Department of Human Services pursuant to Section 104-17 of 15    the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963;16        (vi) an individual who has been found not guilty by 17    reason of insanity and is currently subject to a court 18    order requiring placement in secure inpatient care in the 19    custody of the Department of Human Services pursuant to 20    Section 5-2-4 of the Unified Code of Corrections;21        (vii) an individual subject to temporary detention and 22    examination under Section 3-607 of the Mental Health and 23    Developmental Disabilities Code;24        (viii) an individual deemed clinically appropriate for 25    inpatient admission in a State psychiatric hospital; and26        (ix) an individual transferred by the Department of   HB3640- 11 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Corrections pursuant to Section 3-8-5 of the Unified Code 2    of Corrections.3    "Consumer record" means a record that organizes all 4information on the care, treatment, and rehabilitation 5services rendered to a consumer in a specialized mental health 6rehabilitation facility.7    "Controlled drugs" means those drugs covered under the 8federal Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention Control Act of 91970, as amended, or the Illinois Controlled Substances Act.10    "Department" means the Department of Public Health.11    "Discharge" means the full release of any consumer from a 12facility.13    "Drug administration" means the act in which a single dose 14of a prescribed drug or biological is given to a consumer. The 15complete act of administration entails removing an individual 16dose from a container, verifying the dose with the 17prescriber's orders, giving the individual dose to the 18consumer, and promptly recording the time and dose given.19    "Drug dispensing" means the act entailing the following of 20a prescription order for a drug or biological and proper 21selection, measuring, packaging, labeling, and issuance of the 22drug or biological to a consumer.23    "Emergency" means a situation, physical condition, or one 24or more practices, methods, or operations which present 25imminent danger of death or serious physical or mental harm to 26consumers of a facility.  HB3640- 12 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    "Facility" means a specialized mental health 2rehabilitation facility that provides at least one of the 3following services: (1) triage center; (2) crisis 4stabilization; (3) recovery and rehabilitation supports; or 5(4) transitional living units for 3 or more persons. The 6facility shall provide a 24-hour program that provides 7intensive support and recovery services designed to assist 8persons, 18 years or older, with mental disorders to develop 9the skills to become self-sufficient and capable of increasing 10levels of independent functioning. It includes facilities that 11meet the following criteria:12        (1) 100% of the consumer population of the facility 13    has a diagnosis of serious mental illness;14        (2) no more than 15% of the consumer population of the 15    facility is 65 years of age or older;16        (3) none of the consumers are non-ambulatory;17        (4) none of the consumers have a primary diagnosis of 18    moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability; and19        (5) the facility must have been licensed under the 20    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act or the 21    Nursing Home Care Act immediately preceding July 22, 2013 22    (the effective date of this Act) and qualifies as an 23    institute for mental disease under the federal definition 24    of the term.25    "Facility" does not include the following:26        (1) a home, institution, or place operated by the   HB3640- 13 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    federal government or agency thereof, or by the State of 2    Illinois;3        (2) a hospital, sanitarium, or other institution whose 4    principal activity or business is the diagnosis, care, and 5    treatment of human illness through the maintenance and 6    operation as organized facilities therefor which is 7    required to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act;8        (3) a facility for child care as defined in the Child 9    Care Act of 1969;10        (4) a community living facility as defined in the 11    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act;12        (5) a nursing home or sanitarium operated solely by 13    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 14    spiritual means through prayer, in accordance with the 15    creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious 16    denomination; however, such nursing home or sanitarium 17    shall comply with all local laws and rules relating to 18    sanitation and safety;19        (6) a facility licensed by the Department of Human 20    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 21    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 22    Licensure and Certification Act;23        (7) a supportive residence licensed under the 24    Supportive Residences Licensing Act;25        (8) a supportive living facility in good standing with 26    the program established under Section 5-5.01a of the   HB3640- 14 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Illinois Public Aid Code, except only for purposes of the 2    employment of persons in accordance with Section 3-206.01 3    of the Nursing Home Care Act;4        (9) an assisted living or shared housing establishment 5    licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, 6    except only for purposes of the employment of persons in 7    accordance with Section 3-206.01 of the Nursing Home Care 8    Act;9        (10) an Alzheimer's disease management center 10    alternative health care model licensed under the 11    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act;12        (11) a home, institution, or other place operated by 13    or under the authority of the Illinois Department of 14    Veterans' Affairs;15        (12) a facility licensed under the ID/DD Community 16    Care Act;17        (13) a facility licensed under the Nursing Home Care 18    Act after July 22, 2013 (the effective date of this Act); 19    or20        (14) a facility licensed under the MC/DD Act; or . 21        (15) a psychiatric residential treatment facility 22    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 23    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 24    "Executive director" means a person who is charged with 25the general administration and supervision of a facility 26licensed under this Act and who is a licensed nursing home   HB3640- 15 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1administrator, licensed practitioner of the healing arts, or 2qualified mental health professional.3    "Guardian" means a person appointed as a guardian of the 4person or guardian of the estate, or both, of a consumer under 5the Probate Act of 1975.6    "Identified offender" means a person who meets any of the 7following criteria:8        (1) Has been convicted of, found guilty of, 9    adjudicated delinquent for, found not guilty by reason of 10    insanity for, or found unfit to stand trial for, any 11    felony offense listed in Section 25 of the Health Care 12    Worker Background Check Act, except for the following:13            (i) a felony offense described in Section 10-5 of 14        the Nurse Practice Act;15            (ii) a felony offense described in Section 4, 5, 16        6, 8, or 17.02 of the Illinois Credit Card and Debit 17        Card Act;18            (iii) a felony offense described in Section 5, 19        5.1, 5.2, 7, or 9 of the Cannabis Control Act;20            (iv) a felony offense described in Section 401, 21        401.1, 404, 405, 405.1, 407, or 407.1 of the Illinois 22        Controlled Substances Act; and23            (v) a felony offense described in the 24        Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act.25        (2) Has been convicted of, adjudicated delinquent for, 26    found not guilty by reason of insanity for, or found unfit   HB3640- 16 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    to stand trial for any sex offense as defined in 2    subsection (c) of Section 10 of the Sex Offender 3    Management Board Act.4    "Transitional living units" are residential units within a 5facility that have the purpose of assisting the consumer in 6developing and reinforcing the necessary skills to live 7independently outside of the facility. The duration of stay in 8such a setting shall not exceed 120 days for each consumer. 9Nothing in this definition shall be construed to be a 10prerequisite for transitioning out of a facility.11    "Licensee" means the person, persons, firm, partnership, 12association, organization, company, corporation, or business 13trust to which a license has been issued.14    "Misappropriation of a consumer's property" means the 15deliberate misplacement, exploitation, or wrongful temporary 16or permanent use of a consumer's belongings or money without 17the consent of a consumer or his or her guardian.18    "Neglect" means a facility's failure to provide, or 19willful withholding of, adequate medical care, mental health 20treatment, psychiatric rehabilitation, personal care, or 21assistance that is necessary to avoid physical harm and mental 22anguish of a consumer.23    "Personal care" means assistance with meals, dressing, 24movement, bathing, or other personal needs, maintenance, or 25general supervision and oversight of the physical and mental 26well-being of an individual who is incapable of maintaining a   HB3640- 17 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1private, independent residence or who is incapable of managing 2his or her person, whether or not a guardian has been appointed 3for such individual. "Personal care" shall not be construed to 4confine or otherwise constrain a facility's pursuit to develop 5the skills and abilities of a consumer to become 6self-sufficient and capable of increasing levels of 7independent functioning.8    "Recovery and rehabilitation supports" means a program 9that facilitates a consumer's longer-term symptom management 10and stabilization while preparing the consumer for 11transitional living units by improving living skills and 12community socialization. The duration of stay in such a 13setting shall be established by the Department by rule.14    "Restraint" means:15        (i) a physical restraint that is any manual method or 16    physical or mechanical device, material, or equipment 17    attached or adjacent to a consumer's body that the 18    consumer cannot remove easily and restricts freedom of 19    movement or normal access to one's body; devices used for 20    positioning, including, but not limited to, bed rails, 21    gait belts, and cushions, shall not be considered to be 22    restraints for purposes of this Section; or23        (ii) a chemical restraint that is any drug used for 24    discipline or convenience and not required to treat 25    medical symptoms; the Department shall, by rule, designate 26    certain devices as restraints, including at least all   HB3640- 18 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    those devices that have been determined to be restraints 2    by the United States Department of Health and Human 3    Services in interpretive guidelines issued for the 4    purposes of administering Titles XVIII and XIX of the 5    federal Social Security Act. For the purposes of this Act, 6    restraint shall be administered only after utilizing a 7    coercive free environment and culture.8    "Self-administration of medication" means consumers shall 9be responsible for the control, management, and use of their 10own medication.11    "Crisis stabilization" means a secure and separate unit 12that provides short-term behavioral, emotional, or psychiatric 13crisis stabilization as an alternative to hospitalization or 14re-hospitalization for consumers from residential or community 15placement. The duration of stay in such a setting shall not 16exceed 21 days for each consumer. 17    "Therapeutic separation" means the removal of a consumer 18from the milieu to a room or area which is designed to aid in 19the emotional or psychiatric stabilization of that consumer.20    "Triage center" means a non-residential 23-hour center 21that serves as an alternative to emergency room care, 22hospitalization, or re-hospitalization for consumers in need 23of short-term crisis stabilization. Consumers may access a 24triage center from a number of referral sources, including 25family, emergency rooms, hospitals, community behavioral 26health providers, federally qualified health providers, or   HB3640- 19 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1schools, including colleges or universities. A triage center 2may be located in a building separate from the licensed 3location of a facility, but shall not be more than 1,000 feet 4from the licensed location of the facility and must meet all of 5the facility standards applicable to the licensed location. If 6the triage center does operate in a separate building, safety 7personnel shall be provided, on site, 24 hours per day and the 8triage center shall meet all other staffing requirements 9without counting any staff employed in the main facility 10building. 11(Source: P.A. 102-1053, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.) 12    Section 110. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 13changing Section 3 as follows: 14    (210 ILCS 85/3)15    Sec. 3. As used in this Act: 16    (A) "Hospital" means any institution, place, building, 17buildings on a campus, or agency, public or private, whether 18organized for profit or not, devoted primarily to the 19maintenance and operation of facilities for the diagnosis and 20treatment or care of 2 or more unrelated persons admitted for 21overnight stay or longer in order to obtain medical, including 22obstetric, psychiatric and nursing, care of illness, disease, 23injury, infirmity, or deformity.24    The term "hospital", without regard to length of stay,   HB3640- 20 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1shall also include:2        (a) any facility which is devoted primarily to 3    providing psychiatric and related services and programs 4    for the diagnosis and treatment or care of 2 or more 5    unrelated persons suffering from emotional or nervous 6    diseases;7        (b) all places where pregnant females are received, 8    cared for, or treated during delivery irrespective of the 9    number of patients received; and10        (c) on and after January 1, 2023, a rural emergency 11    hospital, as that term is defined under subsection 12    (kkk)(2) of Section 1861 of the federal Social Security 13    Act; to provide for the expeditious and timely 14    implementation of this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 15    Assembly, emergency rules to implement the changes made to 16    the definition of "hospital" by this amendatory Act of the 17    102nd General Assembly may be adopted by the Department 18    subject to the provisions of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 19    Administrative Procedure Act. 20    The term "hospital" includes general and specialized 21hospitals, tuberculosis sanitaria, mental or psychiatric 22hospitals and sanitaria, and includes maternity homes, 23lying-in homes, and homes for unwed mothers in which care is 24given during delivery.25    The term "hospital" does not include:26        (1) any person or institution required to be licensed   HB3640- 21 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized 2    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD 3    Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;4        (2) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 5    the State or any department or agency thereof, where such 6    department or agency has authority under law to establish 7    and enforce standards for the hospitalization or care 8    facilities under its management and control;9        (3) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 10    the federal government or agencies thereof;11        (4) hospitalization or care facilities maintained by 12    any university or college established under the laws of 13    this State and supported principally by public funds 14    raised by taxation;15        (5) any person or facility required to be licensed 16    pursuant to the Substance Use Disorder Act;17        (6) any facility operated solely by and for persons 18    who rely exclusively upon treatment by spiritual means 19    through prayer, in accordance with the creed or tenets of 20    any well-recognized church or religious denomination;21        (7) an Alzheimer's disease management center 22    alternative health care model licensed under the 23    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act; or24        (8) any veterinary hospital or clinic operated by a 25    veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the 26    Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 or   HB3640- 22 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    maintained by a State-supported or publicly funded 2    university or college; or . 3        (9) a psychiatric residential treatment facility 4    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 5    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 6    (B) "Person" means the State, and any political 7subdivision or municipal corporation, individual, firm, 8partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock 9association, or the legal successor thereof.10    (C) "Department" means the Department of Public Health of 11the State of Illinois.12    (D) "Director" means the Director of Public Health of the 13State of Illinois.14    (E) "Perinatal" means the period of time between the 15conception of an infant and the end of the first month after 16birth.17    (F) "Federally designated organ procurement agency" means 18the organ procurement agency designated by the Secretary of 19the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services for the 20service area in which a hospital is located; except that in the 21case of a hospital located in a county adjacent to Wisconsin 22which currently contracts with an organ procurement agency 23located in Wisconsin that is not the organ procurement agency 24designated by the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services 25for the service area in which the hospital is located, if the 26hospital applies for a waiver pursuant to 42 U.S.C.   HB3640- 23 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b11320b-8(a), it may designate an organ procurement agency 2located in Wisconsin to be thereafter deemed its federally 3designated organ procurement agency for the purposes of this 4Act.5    (G) "Tissue bank" means any facility or program operating 6in Illinois that is certified by the American Association of 7Tissue Banks or the Eye Bank Association of America and is 8involved in procuring, furnishing, donating, or distributing 9corneas, bones, or other human tissue for the purpose of 10injecting, transfusing, or transplanting any of them into the 11human body. "Tissue bank" does not include a licensed blood 12bank. For the purposes of this Act, "tissue" does not include 13organs.14    (H) "Campus", as this term applies to operations, has the 15same meaning as the term "campus" as set forth in federal 16Medicare regulations, 42 CFR 413.65. 17(Source: P.A. 102-1118, eff. 1-18-23.) 18    Section 115. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 19changing Section 1-113 as follows: 20    (210 ILCS 45/1-113)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4151-113)21    Sec. 1-113. "Facility" or "long-term care facility" means 22a private home, institution, building, residence, or any other 23place, whether operated for profit or not, or a county home for 24the infirm and chronically ill operated pursuant to Division   HB3640- 24 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b15-21 or 5-22 of the Counties Code, or any similar institution 2operated by a political subdivision of the State of Illinois, 3which provides, through its ownership or management, personal 4care, sheltered care or nursing for 3 or more persons, not 5related to the applicant or owner by blood or marriage. It 6includes skilled nursing facilities and intermediate care 7facilities as those terms are defined in Title XVIII and Title 8XIX of the federal Social Security Act. It also includes 9homes, institutions, or other places operated by or under the 10authority of the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs.11    "Facility" does not include the following:12        (1) A home, institution, or other place operated by 13    the federal government or agency thereof, or by the State 14    of Illinois, other than homes, institutions, or other 15    places operated by or under the authority of the Illinois 16    Department of Veterans' Affairs;17        (2) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution whose 18    principal activity or business is the diagnosis, care, and 19    treatment of human illness through the maintenance and 20    operation as organized facilities therefor, which is 21    required to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act;22        (3) Any "facility for child care" as defined in the 23    Child Care Act of 1969;24        (4) Any "Community Living Facility" as defined in the 25    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act;26        (5) Any "community residential alternative" as defined   HB3640- 25 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    in the Community Residential Alternatives Licensing Act;2        (6) Any nursing home or sanatorium operated solely by 3    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 4    spiritual means through prayer, in accordance with the 5    creed or tenets of any well-recognized church or religious 6    denomination. However, such nursing home or sanatorium 7    shall comply with all local laws and rules relating to 8    sanitation and safety;9        (7) Any facility licensed by the Department of Human 10    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as 11    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 12    Licensure and Certification Act;13        (8) Any "Supportive Residence" licensed under the 14    Supportive Residences Licensing Act;15        (9) Any "supportive living facility" in good standing 16    with the program established under Section 5-5.01a of the 17    Illinois Public Aid Code, except only for purposes of the 18    employment of persons in accordance with Section 3-206.01;19        (10) Any assisted living or shared housing 20    establishment licensed under the Assisted Living and 21    Shared Housing Act, except only for purposes of the 22    employment of persons in accordance with Section 3-206.01;23        (11) An Alzheimer's disease management center 24    alternative health care model licensed under the 25    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act;26        (12) A facility licensed under the ID/DD Community   HB3640- 26 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Care Act; 2        (13) A facility licensed under the Specialized Mental 3    Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013; 4        (14) A facility licensed under the MC/DD Act; or 5        (15) A medical foster home, as defined in 38 CFR 6    17.73, that is under the oversight of the United States 7    Department of Veterans Affairs; or .8        (16) A psychiatric residential treatment facility 9    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 10    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 11(Source: P.A. 98-104, eff. 7-22-13; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15; 1299-376, eff. 1-1-16; 99-642, eff. 7-28-16.) 13    Section 120. The ID/DD Community Care Act is amended by 14changing Section 1-113 as follows: 15    (210 ILCS 47/1-113)16    Sec. 1-113. Facility. "ID/DD facility" or "facility" 17means an intermediate care facility for persons with 18developmental disabilities, whether operated for profit or 19not, which provides, through its ownership or management, 20personal care or nursing for 3 or more persons not related to 21the applicant or owner by blood or marriage. It includes 22intermediate care facilities for the intellectually disabled 23as the term is defined in Title XVIII and Title XIX of the 24federal Social Security Act.   HB3640- 27 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    "Facility" does not include the following: 2        (1) A home, institution, or other place operated by 3    the federal government or agency thereof, or by the State 4    of Illinois, other than homes, institutions, or other 5    places operated by or under the authority of the Illinois 6    Department of Veterans' Affairs;7        (2) A hospital, sanitarium, or other institution whose 8    principal activity or business is the diagnosis, care, and 9    treatment of human illness through the maintenance and 10    operation as organized facilities therefore, which is 11    required to be licensed under the Hospital Licensing Act;12        (3) Any "facility for child care" as defined in the 13    Child Care Act of 1969;14        (4) Any "community living facility" as defined in the 15    Community Living Facilities Licensing Act;16        (5) Any "community residential alternative" as defined 17    in the Community Residential Alternatives Licensing Act;18        (6) Any nursing home or sanatorium operated solely by 19    and for persons who rely exclusively upon treatment by 20    spiritual means through prayer, in accordance with the 21    creed or tenets of any well recognized church or religious 22    denomination. However, such nursing home or sanatorium 23    shall comply with all local laws and rules relating to 24    sanitation and safety;25        (7) Any facility licensed by the Department of Human 26    Services as a community-integrated living arrangement as   HB3640- 28 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    defined in the Community-Integrated Living Arrangements 2    Licensure and Certification Act;3        (8) Any "supportive residence" licensed under the 4    Supportive Residences Licensing Act;5        (9) Any "supportive living facility" in good standing 6    with the program established under Section 5-5.01a of the 7    Illinois Public Aid Code, except only for purposes of the 8    employment of persons in accordance with Section 3-206.01;9        (10) Any assisted living or shared housing 10    establishment licensed under the Assisted Living and 11    Shared Housing Act, except only for purposes of the 12    employment of persons in accordance with Section 3-206.01; 13        (11) An Alzheimer's disease management center 14    alternative health care model licensed under the 15    Alternative Health Care Delivery Act;16        (12) A home, institution, or other place operated by 17    or under the authority of the Illinois Department of 18    Veterans' Affairs; or 19        (13) Any MC/DD facility licensed under the MC/DD Act; 20    or . 21        (14) A psychiatric residential treatment facility 22    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 23    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 24(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 99-180, eff. 7-29-15; 2599-642, eff. 7-28-16.)   HB3640- 29 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1    Section 125. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 2changing Section 2.06 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 10/2.06)  (from Ch. 23, par. 2212.06)4    Sec. 2.06. "Child care institution" means a child care 5facility where more than 7 children are received and 6maintained for the purpose of providing them with care or 7training or both. The term "child care institution" includes 8residential schools, primarily serving ambulatory children 9with disabilities, and those operating a full calendar year, 10but does not include:11        (a) any State-operated institution for child care 12    established by legislative action;13        (b) any juvenile detention or shelter care home 14    established and operated by any county or child protection 15    district established under the "Child Protection Act";16        (c) any institution, home, place or facility operating 17    under a license pursuant to the Nursing Home Care Act, the 18    Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the 19    ID/DD Community Care Act, or the MC/DD Act;20        (d) any bona fide boarding school in which children 21    are primarily taught branches of education corresponding 22    to those taught in public schools, grades one through 12, 23    or taught in public elementary schools, high schools, or 24    both elementary and high schools, and which operates on a 25    regular academic school year basis;  HB3640- 30 -LRB104 10638 KTG 20715 b1        (e) any facility licensed as a "group home" as defined 2    in this Act; or3        (f) any qualified residential treatment program; or .4        (g) any psychiatric residential treatment facility 5    certified under the Psychiatric Residential Treatment 6    Facilities (PRTF) Act. 7(Source: P.A. 103-564, eff. 11-17-23.) 8    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.